California statutes. Penal Code
(b) Commencing January 1, 2018, the sale, delivery, or transfer of ownership of ammunition by any party may only occur in a face-to-face transaction with the seller, deliverer, or transferor, provided, however, that ammunition may be purchased or acquired over the Internet or through other means of remote ordering if a licensed ammunition vendor initially receives the ammunition and processes the transaction in compliance with this section and Article 3 (commencing with Section 30342) of Chapter 1 of Division 10 of Title 4 of this part.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b)
 shall not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of ammunition to any of the following:

(1) An authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, city and county, or state or federal government, if the sale, delivery, or transfer is for exclusive use by that government agency and, prior to the sale, delivery, or transfer of the ammunition, written authorization from the head of the agency employing the purchaser or transferee is obtained, identifying the employee as an individual authorized to conduct the transaction, and authorizing the transaction for the exclusive use of the agency employing the individual.

(2) A sworn peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, or sworn federal law enforcement officer, who is authorized to
 carry a firearm in the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(3) An importer or manufacturer of ammunition or firearms who is licensed to engage in business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(4) A person who is on the centralized list of exempted federal firearms licensees maintained by the Department of Justice pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 28450) of Chapter 6 of Division 6 of this title.

(5) A person whose licensed premises are outside this state and who is licensed as a dealer or collector of firearms pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code
 and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(6) A person who is licensed as a collector of firearms pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, whose licensed premises are within this state, and who has a current certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 26710.

(7) An ammunition vendor.

(8) A consultant-evaluator.

(9) A person who purchases or receives ammunition at a target facility holding a business or other regulatory license, provided that the ammunition is at all times kept within the facility’s premises.

(10) A person who purchases or receives ammunition from a spouse, registered domestic partner, or immediate family member as defined in Section 16720.

(11) A person enrolled in the basic training academy for peace officers or any other course certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, an instructor of the academy or course, or a staff member of the academy or entity providing the course, who is purchasing the ammunition for the purpose of participation or use in the course.

(d) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 783, Sec. 3.   (AB 693)   Effective October 14, 2017.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

30314.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2018, a resident of this state shall not bring or transport into this state any ammunition that he or she purchased or otherwise obtained from outside of this state unless he or she first has that ammunition delivered to a licensed ammunition vendor for delivery to that resident pursuant to the procedures set forth in Section 30312.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An ammunition vendor.

(2) A sworn peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, or sworn federal law enforcement officer, who is authorized to carry a
 firearm in the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(3) An importer or manufacturer of ammunition or firearms who is licensed to engage in business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(4) A person who is on the centralized list of exempted federal firearms licensees maintained by the Department of Justice pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 28450) of Chapter 6 of Division 6.

(5) A person who is licensed as a collector of firearms pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, whose licensed premises are within this state, and who has a current certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of Justice pursuant
 to Section 26710.

(6) A person who acquired the ammunition from a spouse, registered domestic partner, or immediate family member as defined in Section 16720.

(c) A violation of this section is an infraction for any first time offense, and either an infraction or a misdemeanor for any subsequent offense.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.7.)
-------------------------------------------

30315.

Any person, firm, or corporation who, within this state knowingly possesses any handgun ammunition designed primarily to penetrate metal or armor is guilty of a public offense and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or in the county jail for a term not to exceed one year, or by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 548.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

30320.

Any person, firm, or corporation who, within this state, manufactures, imports, sells, offers to sell, or knowingly transports any handgun ammunition designed primarily to penetrate metal or armor is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in state prison, or by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30325.

Nothing in this article shall apply to or affect the possession of handgun ammunition designed primarily to penetrate metal or armor by a person who found the ammunition, if that person is not prohibited from possessing firearms or ammunition pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30305, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the person is transporting the ammunition to a law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30330.

Nothing in this article shall apply to or affect the sale to, purchase by, possession of, or use of any ammunition by any member of the Army, Navy, Air Force, or Marine Corps of the United States, or the National Guard, while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment, or any police agency or forensic laboratory or any person who is the holder of a valid permit issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of Title 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30335.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit the possession, importation, sale, attempted sale, or transport of ammunition from which the propellant has been removed and the primer has been permanently deactivated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30340.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit the manufacture of ammunition under contracts approved by agencies of the state or federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Ammunition Vendors [30342. - 30365.]

30342.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2018, a valid ammunition vendor license shall be required for any person, firm, corporation, or other business enterprise to sell more than 500 rounds of ammunition in any 30-day period.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to, or affect the sale of, ammunition to a person who holds a valid ammunition vendor license by a person in order to comply with Section 6389 of the Family Code.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to, or affect the sale of, ammunition to a person who holds a valid ammunition vendor license by a person in order to comply with Section 527.9 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Subdivision (a) does not apply to, or affect the sale of, ammunition to a person who holds a valid ammunition vendor license by a person in order to comply with Section 18120.

(e) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 31) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 544, Sec. 32.   (SB 899)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

30345.

(a) A vendor shall comply with all of the conditions, requirements, and prohibitions stated in this article.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2022, the Department of Justice may inspect ammunition vendors to ensure compliance with subdivision (a) and any other applicable state or federal firearms laws. The department may adopt regulations to administer the application and enforcement provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 273, Sec. 2.   (AB 2061)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

30347.

(a) An ammunition vendor shall require any agent or employee who handles, sells, delivers, or has under his or her custody or control any ammunition, to obtain and provide to the vendor a certificate of eligibility from the Department of Justice issued pursuant to Section 26710. On the application for the certificate, the agent or employee shall provide the name and address of the ammunition vendor with whom the person is employed, or the name and California firearms dealer number of the ammunition vendor if applicable.

(b) The department shall notify the ammunition vendor in the event that the agent or employee who has a certificate of eligibility is or becomes prohibited from possessing ammunition under subdivision (a) of Section 30305 or
 federal law.

(c) An ammunition vendor shall not permit any agent or employee who the vendor knows or reasonably should know is a person described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to handle, sell, deliver, or have under his or her custody or control, any ammunition in the course and scope of employment.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.10.)
-------------------------------------------

30348.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the sale of ammunition by a licensed vendor shall be conducted at the location specified in the license.

(b) A vendor may sell ammunition at a gun show or event if the gun show or event is not conducted from any motorized or towed vehicle.

(c) For purposes of this section, “gun show or event” means a function sponsored by any national, state, or local organization, devoted to the collection, competitive use, or other sporting use of firearms, or an organization or association that sponsors functions devoted to the collection, competitive use, or other sporting use of firearms in the community.

(d) Sales of ammunition at a gun show or event shall comply with all applicable laws including Sections 30347, 30350, 30352, and 30360.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.11.)
-------------------------------------------

30350.

An ammunition vendor shall not sell or otherwise transfer ownership of, offer for sale or otherwise offer to transfer ownership of, or display for sale or display for transfer of ownership of any ammunition in a manner that allows that ammunition to be accessible to a purchaser or transferee without the assistance of the vendor or an employee of the vendor.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.12.)
-------------------------------------------

30352.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2019, an ammunition vendor shall not sell or otherwise transfer ownership of any ammunition without, at the time of delivery, legibly recording the following information on a form to be prescribed by the Department of Justice:

(1) The date of the sale or other transfer.

(2) The purchaser’s or transferee’s driver’s license or other identification number and the state in which it was issued.

(3) The brand, type, and amount of ammunition sold or otherwise transferred.

(4) The purchaser’s or transferee’s full name and signature.

(5) The name of the salesperson who processed the sale or other transaction.

(6) The purchaser’s or transferee’s full residential address and telephone number.

(7) The purchaser’s or transferee’s date of birth.

(b) (1) Commencing July 1, 2019, an ammunition vendor shall electronically submit to the department the information required by subdivision (a) for all sales and transfers of ownership of ammunition. The department shall retain this information in a database to be known as the Ammunition Purchase Records File. Except as provided in paragraph (2), this information shall remain confidential and may be used by the department and those entities specified in, and pursuant to, subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 11105, through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, only for law enforcement purposes. The ammunition vendor shall not use, sell, disclose, or share the information for any other purpose other than the submission required by this subdivision without the express written consent of the purchaser or transferee.

(2) The information collected by the department as provided in paragraph (1) shall be available to researchers affiliated with the California Firearm Violence Research Center at
 UC Davis following approval by the institution’s governing institutional review board, when required. At the department’s discretion, and subject to Section 14240, the data may be provided to any other nonprofit bona fide research institution accredited by the United States Department of Education or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation for the study of the prevention of violence, following approval by the institution’s governing institutional review board or human subjects committee, when required, for academic and policy research purposes. Material identifying individuals shall only be provided for research or statistical activities and shall not be transferred, revealed, or used for purposes other than research or statistical activities, and reports or publications derived therefrom shall not identify specific individuals. Reasonable costs to the department associated with the department’s processing of that data may be billed to the researcher. If a request for data or letter of support for
 research using the data is denied, the department shall provide a written statement of the specific reasons for the denial.

(c) Commencing on July 1, 2019, only those persons listed in this subdivision, or those persons or entities listed in subdivision (e), shall be authorized to purchase ammunition. Prior to delivering any ammunition, an ammunition vendor shall require bona fide evidence of identity to verify that the person who is receiving delivery of the ammunition is a person or entity listed in subdivision (e) or one of the following:

(1) A person authorized to purchase ammunition pursuant to Section 30370.

(2) A person who was approved by the department to receive a firearm from the ammunition vendor, pursuant to Section 28220, if that vendor is a licensed firearms dealer, and the
 ammunition is delivered to the person in the same transaction as the firearm.

(d) Commencing July 1, 2019, the ammunition vendor shall verify with the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, that the person is authorized to purchase ammunition. If the person is not listed as an authorized ammunition purchaser, the vendor shall deny the sale or transfer.

(e) Subdivisions (a) and (d) shall not apply to sales or other transfers of ownership of ammunition by ammunition vendors to any of the following, if properly identified:

(1) An ammunition vendor.

(2) A person who is on the centralized list of exempted federal firearms licensees maintained by the department pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 28450) of Chapter 6 of Division
 6 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(3) A person who purchases or receives ammunition at a target facility holding a business or other regulatory license, provided that the ammunition is at all times kept within the facility’s premises.

(4) A gunsmith.

(5) A wholesaler.

(6) A manufacturer or importer of firearms or ammunition licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Part I of Title 18 of the United States Code, and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(7) An authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, city
 and county, or state or federal government, if the sale or other transfer of ownership is for exclusive use by that government agency, and, prior to the sale, delivery, or transfer of the handgun ammunition, written authorization from the head of the agency authorizing the transaction is presented to the person from whom the purchase, delivery, or transfer is being made. Proper written authorization is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by which the purchaser, transferee, or person otherwise acquiring ownership is employed, identifying the employee as an individual authorized to conduct the transaction, and authorizing the transaction for the exclusive use of the agency by which that individual is employed.

(8) (A) A properly identified sworn peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, or properly identified sworn federal law enforcement
 officer, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of the officer's duties.

(B) (i) Proper identification is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by which the purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the purchaser or transferee as a full-time paid peace officer who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of the officer's duties.

(ii) The certification shall be delivered to the vendor at the time of purchase or transfer and the purchaser or transferee shall provide bona fide evidence of identity to verify that the purchaser transferee is the person authorized in the certification.

(iii) The vendor shall keep the certification with the record of sale and submit the certification to the department.

(f) The department is authorized to adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 253, Sec. 11.   (AB 173)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

30352.1.

(a) Subdivisions (a), (c), and (d) of Section 30352 shall not apply to sales or other transfers of ownership of ammunition by ammunition vendors to any competitor of the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games as follows, if properly identified:

(1) The competitor presents an accredited credential issued by the International Olympic Committee, International Paralympic Committee, International Shooting Sport Federation, or World Shooting Para Sport.

(2) The competitor will participate in any competitive or training event that utilizes firearms and is conducted under the supervision or control of an entity authorized by the International Olympic Committee, International Paralympic
 Committee, International Shooting Sport Federation, or World Shooting Para Sport.

(b) Prior to delivering ammunition under this section, an ammunition vendor shall require bona fide evidence of identity, as defined in Section 16300, a foreign passport, or other travel document used to enter the United States to verify that the person who is receiving delivery of the ammunition is a person listed in subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027, and shall become inoperative upon the later of October 1, 2028, or the conclusion of the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 354, Sec. 5.   (AB 191)   Effective September 20, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative on or after October 1, 2028, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

30355.

Commencing February 1, 2011, the records required by this article shall be maintained on the premises of the vendor for a period of not less than five years from the date of the recorded transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30357.

(a) Commencing February 1, 2011, the records referred to in Section 30352 shall be subject to inspection at any time during normal business hours by any peace officer employed by a sheriff, city police department, or district attorney as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 830.1, or employed by the department as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 830.1, provided that the officer is conducting an investigation where access to those records is or may be relevant, is seeking information about persons prohibited from owning a firearm or ammunition, or is engaged in ensuring compliance with the Dangerous Weapons Control Law, as defined in Section 23500, or any other laws pertaining to firearms or ammunition.

(b) The records referred to in Section 30352 shall also be subject to inspection at any time during normal business hours by any other employee of the department, provided that the employee is conducting an investigation where access to those records is or may be relevant, is seeking information about persons prohibited from owning a firearm or ammunition, or is engaged in ensuring compliance with the Dangerous Weapons Control Law, as defined in Section 23500, or any other laws pertaining to firearms or ammunition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30360.

Commencing February 1, 2011, a vendor shall not knowingly make a false entry in, fail to make a required entry in, fail to obtain the required thumbprint, or otherwise fail to maintain in the required manner, records prepared in accordance with Section 30352. If the right thumbprint is not available, then the vendor shall have the purchaser or transferee use the left thumb, or any available finger, and shall so indicate on the form.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30362.

(a) Commencing February 1, 2011, no vendor shall, during any inspection conducted pursuant to this article, refuse to permit a person authorized under Section 30357 to examine any record prepared in accordance with this article.

(b) Commencing February 1, 2011, no vendor shall refuse to permit the use of any record or information by a person authorized under Section 30357.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30363.

Within 48 hours of discovery, an ammunition vendor shall report the loss or theft of any of the following items to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the city, county, or city and county where the vendor’s business premises are located:

(1) Any ammunition that is merchandise of the vendor.

(2) Any ammunition that the vendor takes possession of pursuant to Section 30312.

(3) Any ammunition kept at the vendor’s place of business.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.14.)
-------------------------------------------

30365.

(a) A violation of Section 30352, 30355, 30360, or 30362 is a misdemeanor.

(b) The provisions of this section are cumulative, and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by different provisions of law shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Ammunition Purchase Authorizations  [30370. - 30372.]

30370.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2019, the department shall electronically approve the purchase or transfer of ammunition through a vendor, as defined in Section 16151, except as otherwise specified. This approval shall occur at the time of purchase or transfer, prior to the purchaser or transferee taking possession of the ammunition. Pursuant to the authorization specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 30352, the following persons are authorized to purchase ammunition:

(1) A purchaser or transferee whose information matches an entry in the Automated Firearms System (AFS) and who is eligible to possess ammunition as specified in subdivision (b).

(2) A purchaser or transferee who has a
 current certificate of eligibility issued by the department pursuant to Section 26710.

(3) A purchaser or transferee who is not prohibited from purchasing or possessing ammunition in a single ammunition transaction or purchase made pursuant to the procedure developed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) To determine if the purchaser or transferee is eligible to purchase or possess ammunition pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the department shall cross-reference the ammunition purchaser’s or transferee’s name, date of birth, current address, and driver’s license or other government identification number, as described in Section 28180, with the information maintained in the AFS. If the purchaser’s or transferee’s information does not match an AFS entry, the transaction shall be denied. If the purchaser’s or transferee’s information matches an AFS entry, the department shall
 determine if the purchaser or transferee falls within a class of persons who are prohibited from owning or possessing ammunition by cross-referencing with the Prohibited Armed Persons File. If the purchaser or transferee is prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm, the transaction shall be denied.

(c) The department shall develop a procedure in which a person who is not prohibited from purchasing or possessing ammunition may be approved for a single ammunition transaction or purchase. The department shall recover the cost of processing and regulatory and enforcement activities related to this section by charging the ammunition transaction or purchase applicant a fee not to exceed the fee charged for the department’s Dealers’ Record of Sale (DROS) process, as described in Section
 28225, as it read on December 31, 2019, and not to exceed the department’s reasonable costs.

(d) A vendor is prohibited from providing a purchaser or transferee ammunition without department approval. If a vendor cannot electronically verify a person’s eligibility to purchase or possess ammunition via an internet connection, the department shall provide a telephone line to verify eligibility. This option is available to ammunition vendors who can demonstrate legitimate geographical and telecommunications limitations in submitting the information electronically and who are approved by the department to use the telephone line verification.

(e) The department shall recover the reasonable cost of regulatory and enforcement activities related to this article by charging ammunition purchasers and transferees a per transaction fee not to exceed one dollar ($1), provided, however, that the Attorney General may adjust the fee as needed pursuant to this section, not to exceed the reasonable regulatory and enforcement costs for operating the program related to this article.

(f) A fund to be known as the “Ammunition Safety and Enforcement Special Fund” is hereby created within the State Treasury. All fees received pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Ammunition Safety and Enforcement Special Fund and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated for purposes of implementing, operating, and enforcing the ammunition authorization program provided for in this section and Section 30352 and for repaying the
 start-up loan provided for in Section 30371.

(g) The Department of Justice is authorized to adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 30.5.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 32 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 249.   Note: Stats. 2016, Ch. 55, Sec. 16, repealed the prior version of Section 30370, which was added November 8, 2016, by Proposition 63.)
-------------------------------------------

30371.

(a) There is hereby appropriated twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) from the General Fund as a loan for the start-up costs of implementing, operating and enforcing the provisions of the ammunition authorization program provided for in Sections 30352 and 30370.

(b) For purposes of repaying the loan, the Controller shall, after disbursing moneys necessary to implement, operate and enforce the ammunition authorization program provided for in Sections 30352 and 30370, transfer all proceeds from fees received by the Ammunition Safety and Enforcement Special Fund up to the amount of the loan provided by this section, including interest at the pooled money investment account rate, to the General Fund.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.15.)
-------------------------------------------

30372.

(a) If a person attempts to purchase or otherwise acquire ammunition and the sale or other transfer is not approved by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 30370 because the person is prohibited from possessing ammunition pursuant to Section 30305, the department shall notify the local law enforcement agency with primary jurisdiction in which the person was last known to reside of the attempt.

(b) A local law enforcement agency that receives a notification pursuant to subdivision (a) may investigate whether the person is in unlawful possession of a firearm. However, the law enforcement agency shall not contact the person until it has attempted to confirm both
 of the following:

(1) That the person is prohibited from possessing ammunition pursuant to Section 30305.

(2) That the person did in fact attempt to make the reported purchase.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply if the sale or other transfer is not approved only because the address in the Automated Firearms System does not match the address on the person’s identification, if there is a matching file with the same name, date of birth, and identification number.

(d) This section does not authorize a law enforcement agency to conduct a search without a warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 100, Sec. 2.   (AB 2551)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Ammunition Vendor Licenses  [30385. - 30395.]

30385.

(a) The Department of Justice is authorized to issue ammunition vendor licenses pursuant to this article. The department shall, commencing July 1, 2017, commence accepting applications for ammunition vendor licenses. If an application is denied, the department shall inform the applicant of the reason for denial in writing.

(b) The ammunition vendor license shall be issued in a form prescribed by the department and shall be valid for a period of one year. The department may adopt regulations to administer the application and enforcement provisions of this article. The license shall allow the licensee to sell ammunition at the location specified in the license or at a gun show or event as set forth in Section 30348.

(c) (1) In the case of an entity other than a natural person, the department shall issue the license to the entity, but shall require a responsible person to pass the background check pursuant to Section 30395.

(2) For purposes of this article, “responsible person” means a person having the power to direct the management, policies, and practices of the entity as it pertains to ammunition.

(d) Commencing January 1, 2018, a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, shall automatically be deemed a licensed ammunition vendor, provided the dealer complies with the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 30300) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 30342).

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.16.)
-------------------------------------------

30390.

(a) The Department of Justice may charge ammunition vendor license applicants a reasonable fee sufficient to reimburse the department for the reasonable, estimated costs of administering the license program, including the enforcement of this program and maintenance of the registry of ammunition vendors.

(b) The fees received by the department pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Ammunition Vendors Special Account, which is hereby created. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the revenue in the fund is continuously appropriated for use by the department for the purpose of implementing, administering and enforcing the provisions of this article, and for collecting and maintaining information submitted pursuant to
 Section 30352.

(c) The revenue in the Firearms Safety and Enforcement Special Fund shall also be available upon appropriation to the department for the purpose of implementing and enforcing the provisions of this article.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.16.)
-------------------------------------------

30395.

(a) The Department of Justice is authorized to issue ammunition vendor licenses to applicants who the department has determined, either as an individual or a responsible person, are not prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing ammunition under subdivision (a) of Section 30305 or federal law, and who provide a copy of each of the following documents, as applicable:

(1) Any regulatory or business license required by local government.

(2) A valid seller’s permit issued by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to Section 6067 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and, commencing July 1, 2024, a valid certificate of registration issued pursuant to Section 36036 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) A valid federal firearms license, if the person is so licensed.

(4) A certificate of
 eligibility issued by the Department of Justice.

(b) The department shall keep a registry of all licensed ammunition vendors. Law enforcement agencies shall be provided access to the registry for law enforcement purposes.

(c) An ammunition vendor license is subject to forfeiture for a breach of any of the prohibitions and requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 30300) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 30342).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 5.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Firearm Precursor Parts [30400. - 30425.]



  ARTICLE 1. Restrictions Relating to Firearm Precursor Parts [30400. - 30425.]

30400.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) and in Section 30420, or except by operation of law, it shall be unlawful for a person to purchase, sell, offer to sell, or transfer ownership of any firearm precursor part in this state that is not a federally regulated firearm precursor part.

(b) This section does not apply to either of the following:

(1) The purchase of a firearm precursor part that is not a federally regulated firearm precursor part by a federally licensed firearms manufacturer or importer, or by a federal licensee authorized to serialize firearms.

(2) The sale, offer to sell, or transfer of ownership of a firearm precursor part that is not a federally regulated firearm precursor part to a federally licensed firearms manufacturer or importer, or to a federal licensee authorized to serialize firearms.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 24.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30401.

(a) The department may, upon receipt of a written request or form prescribed by the department, issue a determination to a person regarding whether an item or kit is a firearm precursor part.

(b) Any request or form submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be executed under the penalty of perjury with a complete and accurate description of the item or kit, the name and address of the manufacturer or importer thereof, and a sample of the item or kit for examination.

(c) The sample of the item or kit shall include all accessories and attachments relevant to the firearm precursor part determination
 as each determination is limited to the submitted sample. The sample shall include any associated templates, jigs, molds, equipment, or tools that are made available by the seller, distributor, or manufacturer of the item or kit to the purchaser or recipient of the item or kit, and any instructions, guides, or marketing materials if they will be made available by the seller, distributor, or manufacturer with the item or kit.

(d) Upon completion of the examination, the department may return the sample to the person who made the request unless a determination is made that return of the sample would be a, or would place the person in, violation of the law. Unless otherwise stated by the department, a determination made by the department pursuant to this section shall not be deemed by any person to be applicable to, or authoritative with respect to,
 any other sample, design, model, or configuration.
